Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-910.07
Unit or cooperative development; unit production; allocation; property of several owners.

The portion of the unit production allocated to any tract, and the proceeds from the sale thereof, shall be the property and income of the several persons to whom, or to whose credit, the same are allocated or payable under the order providing for unit operations.

Laws 1965, c. 343, § 8, p. 980.